District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.11

Revocation by instrument authorized; revocation by act not permitted.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, an instrument is effective to revoke a recorded transfer on death deed, or any part of it, only if the instrument:

(1)

Is one of the following:

(A)

A transfer on death deed that revokes the deed or part of the deed expressly or by inconsistency;

(B)

An instrument of revocation that expressly revokes the deed or part of the deed; or

(C)

An inter vivos deed that expressly revokes the transfer on death deed or part of the deed; and

(2)

Is acknowledged by the transferor after the acknowledgment of the deed being revoked and recorded before the transferor’s death in the public records in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds.

(b)

If a transfer on death deed is made by more than one transferor:

(1)

Revocation by a transferor does not affect the deed as to the interest of another transferor; and

(2)

A deed of joint owners is revoked only if it is revoked by all of the living joint owners.

(c)

After a transfer on death deed is recorded, it may not be revoked by a revocatory act on the deed.

(d)

This section does not limit the effect of an inter vivos transfer of the property.

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606
This section is referenced in § 19-604.06.